Missouri, session 2026, HB2268.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 37, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto three new sections, to be
known as sections 37.1300, 37.1310, and 37.1320, to read as follows:
37.1300. For the purposes of sections 37.1300 to 37.1320, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Council", the Missouri GIS advisory council established in section 37.1310;
(2) "Geographic information system (GIS)", a computer system for capturing,
storing, checking, and displaying data related to positions on the Earth's surface that
enables easily seeing, analyzing, and understanding patterns and relationships;
(3) "Geospatial", relating to or denoting data that is associated with a particular
location;
(4) "Missouri Spatial Data Information Service" or "MSDIS", Missouri's
primary spatial data clearinghouse responsible for collecting and distributing vector
data, aerial photography, and light detection and ranging elevation data that are
generated, updated, and funded by state, local, and regional agencies and governments.
37.1310. There is hereby established within the office of administration the
"Missouri GIS Advisory Council", which is charged with assisting and advising the
state in ensuring the availability, implementation, and enhancement of a statewide
geospatial data infrastructure common to all jurisdictions. The council shall be
established within the information technology services division of the office of the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2268 2
commissioner of administration. The council shall serve to support the existing
geospatial infrastructure within the state of Missouri and shall strive toward the
immediate access to statewide geospatial data for all citizens of this state, especially life-
safety entities, including Next Generation 911.
37.1320. 1. The council shall consist of the following members at a minimum:
(1) The commissioner of administration or the commissioner's designee;
(2) The director of the department of conservation or the director's designee;
(3) The director of the department of economic development or the director's
designee;
(4) The director of the department of health and senior services or the director's
designee;
(5) The director of the department of natural resources or the director's
designee;
(6) The director of the department of the National Guard or the director's
designee;
(7) The director of the department of public safety or the director's designee;
(8) The director of the department of transportation or the director's designee;
(9) The director of the United States Geological Survey or the director's
designee;
(10) The chief of the United States Department of Agriculture or the chief's
designee;
(11) The chair of the Missouri 911 service board or the chair's designee;
(12) The director of the Missouri Spatial Data Information Service or the
director's designee;
(13) The director of the state land survey program or the director's designee;
(14) The director of the National Geospatial Intelligence Agency - West; and
(15) Fourteen citizens of Missouri appointed by the commissioner of the office of
administration. These individuals shall represent city, county, local, and federal
government; the private sector; public safety; and academia.
2. By invitation of the council, additional subject matter experts may participate
in activities as noncouncil members. Such noncouncil members shall not be required to
be appointed by the commissioner of administration.
3. Appointed members of the council shall serve two-year terms and shall serve
until their successors are appointed. Vacancies on the council shall be filled in the same
manner as the original appointment, and such member appointed shall serve the
remainder of the unexpired term.

HB 2268 3
4. The council shall meet at least quarterly and as otherwise required by the
commissioner of the office of administration or the office of geospatial information.
5. The council shall designate from its members a chair and chair-elect for one-
year terms and shall adopt written guidelines to govern the management of the council.
6. Each member of the council shall serve without compensation but may be
reimbursed for his or her actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of
his or her duties as a member of the council, subject to appropriation.
7. The council shall designate from its members an executive secretary for the
council, who shall maintain the records and decisions of the council's activities in
accordance with state law and shall be responsible for correspondence between the
council and other agencies.
8. The council shall not collect the personally identifiable information of any
individual person. For purposes of this subsection, the term "personally identifiable
information" means information that can be used to distinguish or trace an individual's
identity including, but not limited to, name, Social Security number, or biometric data
records, either alone or when combined with other personal or identifying information
that is linked or linkable to a specific individual.
✔